Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2605.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3208.1 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3208.1. Commonwealth interference prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--The Commonwealth shall not interfere with the use of medically appropriate methods of contraception or fertility treatment or the manner in which medically appropriate methods of contraception or fertility treatment are provided.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Fertility treatment." Includes:(1) The preservation of human oocytes, sperm or embryos for later reproductive use.123456789101112131415161718 (2) Artificial insemination, including intravaginal insemination, intracervical insemination and intrauterine insemination.(3) Assisted reproductive technology, including in vitro fertilization and other treatments or procedures in which oocytes, sperm, fertilized eggs, embryos and other reproductive genetic material are handled.(4) Genetic testing of embryos.(5) Medication prescribed or obtained over-the-counter, as indicated for fertility.(6) Gamete donation.(7) Other information, referrals, treatments, procedures, medications, laboratory testing, technologies or services relating to fertility.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2605PN3528 - 2 - 123456789101112131415